Vermont, session 2025-2026, H88.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. UTILITY DISCONNECTION RULE; EXTREME HEAT
(a) On or before June 1, 2026, and for the purpose of protecting the health
and safety of Vermonters, the Public Utility Commission shall adopt a rule
prohibiting an electric, water, or wastewater utility from involuntarily
disconnecting residential service for nonpayment during a period of extreme
heat in the utility’s service territory. For purposes of this section, residential
service includes service to tenants in metered apartment buildings and
VT LEG #379357 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.88
2025 Page 2 of 5
residents of mobile home parks. The rule shall include the following
provisions:
(1) A process that allows a resident to reconnect utility service during a
period of extreme heat if their service was previously disconnected for
nonpayment.
(2) A process that allows a utility to require a resident to enter into a
reasonable repayment plan prior to reconnecting service pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) A process for informing residents of their rights under this section.
(4) A requirement that each utility keep a written record of all
reconnection requests received pursuant to this section and all service
disconnections rescheduled due to extreme heat. Such record shall be
available for inspection by the Public Utility Commission or the Department of
Public Service, upon request.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Period of extreme heat” means that, within the 24 hours following
the scheduled disconnection, the forecasted temperature is at or above 92
degrees Fahrenheit or the National Weather Service has issued or has
announced that it intends to issue a heat-related alert, such as an excessive heat
warning, a heat advisory, an excessive heat watch, or a similar alert.
VT LEG #379357 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.88
2025 Page 3 of 5
(2) “Utility” means an electric, water, or wastewater utility subject to the
jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission under 30 V.S.A. § 203(3) and
(6).
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 5143 is amended to read:
§ 5143. DISCONNECTION OF SERVICE
(a) No municipality shall disconnect service to a ratepayer unless payment
of a valid bill or charge is delinquent as defined herein, and notice of
disconnection has been provided previously to the ratepayer. A copy of the
notice shall be sent to the occupant of a residential dwelling that will be
affected by the disconnection if the occupant is different than the ratepayer.
(b) Disconnection shall not be permitted if:
(1) The delinquent bill or charge, or aggregate delinquent bills and
charges, do not exceed $15.00.
(2) The delinquency is due solely to a disputed portion of a charge that
is the subject of an appeal.
(3) The delinquency is due to a failure to pay a deposit, line extension,
special assessment, special construction charge, or other nonrecurring charge.
(4) The disconnection would represent an immediate and serious hazard
to the health of the ratepayer or a resident within the ratepayer’s household, as
set forth in a physician’s certificate that is on file with the municipality. Notice
by telephone or otherwise that such certificate will be forthcoming will have
VT LEG #379357 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.88
2025 Page 4 of 5
the effect of receipt, providing the certificate is in fact received within seven
days.
(5) The ratepayer has not been given an opportunity to enter into a
reasonable agreement to pay the delinquent bill or, having made such
agreement, has abided by its terms.
(6) The disconnection for a delinquency would occur during a period of
extreme heat. As used in this section, “period of extreme heat” means that,
within 24 hours following the scheduled disconnection, the forecasted
temperature is at or above 92 degrees Fahrenheit or the National Weather
Service has issued or announced that it intends to issue a heat-related alert,
such as an excessive heat warning, a heat advisory, an excessive heat watch, or
a similar alert.
(c) The tenant of a rental dwelling noticed for disconnection due to the
delinquency of the ratepayer shall have the right to request and pay for
continued service from the utility or reconnection of water and sewer service
for the rental dwelling, which the utility shall provide. If any water and sewer
charges or fees are included in the tenant’s rent, the tenant may deduct the cost
of any water and sewer service charges or fees paid to the municipality from
his or her the tenant’s rent pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 4459. Under such
circumstances, the utility shall not require the tenant to pay any arrearage
greater than one billing cycle.
VT LEG #379357 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.88
2025 Page 5 of 5
(d) During a period of extreme heat, a resident may request that a utility
reconnect service that had previously been disconnected for nonpayment. If
required by the utility, the resident shall enter into a repayment plan prior to
the reconnection. A repayment plan shall not require a resident to make
monthly payments in excess of six percent of the resident’s monthly income.
A resident may agree to pay a higher percentage during the repayment period
but shall not be in default unless payment during this period is less than six
percent of the resident’s monthly income. If assistance payments are received
by the resident after implementation of the plan, the resident shall contact the
utility to reformulate the plan.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379357 v.1